Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 11 County Grand Juries

12-11-1.
Number of members.

The grand jury shall consist of not less than thirteen (13) nor more than twenty-three (23) persons. Whenever the attorney general shall by motion in writing make application to any justice of the superior court for a grand jury to consist of twenty-three (23) persons, the motion shall immediately be granted.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1948, § 40; G.L. 1923, ch. 329, § 40; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 38; G.L., ch. 506, § 36; P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-11-1

.

12-11-2.
Attendance on court — Providence and Bristol counties.

The grand jury shall attend the superior court at Providence for the counties of Providence and Bristol on the third Monday of September of each year; and on the first regular court day of every sixth week thereafter until the second Monday of July, unless at least ten (10) days prior to the day on which a grand jury is to commence its term the presiding justice orders in writing that a grand jury shall not be summoned for that term. However, the presiding justice or any other justice of the superior court may at the request of the attorney general in writing filed in the office of the clerk of the court of the county cause the grand jury in attendance on the superior court at Providence for the counties of Providence and Bristol to attend continuously for all or any part of its session in between the second Monday in September and the second Monday in July of the following year and also during all or any part of its vacation from the second Monday in July to the second Monday in September in each year, when in the discretion of the presiding justice or any other justice of the superior court for the counties it is for the public interest and the proper administration of justice to do so.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 148, § 39; G.L. 1923, ch. 329, § 39; P.L. 1931, ch. 1774, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 37; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 35; P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3622, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3729, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

12-11-2

; P.L. 1973, ch. 170, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 221, § 2.

12-11-3.
Attendance on court — Newport, Kent, and Washington counties.

The grand jury shall attend the superior court:

At Newport, for the county of Newport, on the second Mondays of September and June and the fourth Mondays of November and March in each year, unless at least ten (10) days prior to the day on which a grand jury is to commence its term the presiding justice orders in writing that a grand jury shall not be summoned for that term;

At Warwick or at any other place in the county of Kent that may be designated by the presiding justice, for the county of Kent, on the third Monday of September, the first Monday of December, the second Monday of April and the fourth Monday of June in each year, unless at least ten (10) days prior to the day on which a grand jury is to commence its term the presiding justice orders in writing that a grand jury shall not be summoned for that term; and

At South Kingstown, for the county of Washington, on the first Mondays of October and April, the second Monday of December and the third Monday of June, unless at least ten (10) days prior to the day on which a grand jury is to commence its term the presiding justice orders in writing that a grand jury shall not be summoned for that term.

The presiding justice or any other justice of the superior court may at the request of the attorney general in writing filed in the office of the clerk of the county cause any grand juries attending the superior court for any of those counties to attend continuously for all or any part of its session and also during all or any part of its vacation, when in the discretion of the presiding justice or any other justice of the superior court for the county it is for the public interest and the proper administration of justice to do so.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1948, § 39; G.L. 1923, ch. 329, § 39; P.L. 1931, ch. 1774, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 37; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 35; P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3622, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3729, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-11-3

; P.L. 1974, ch. 221, § 2; P.L. 1976, ch. 18, § 1.

12-11-3.1.
Additional county grand juries.

Whenever the attorney general shall make application in writing, the presiding justice may order the impaneling of additional county grand juries to attend the superior court at such places and for any time, but not to exceed six (6) months, that he or she directs, and the county grand juries may sit simultaneously.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 319, § 1.

12-11-4.
Repealed.

12-11-5.
Administration of oaths to witnesses.

The foreperson of every grand jury shall have full power and authority to administer all necessary oaths and affirmations to witnesses who shall be examined before the grand jury.

History of Section.

P.L. 1920, ch. 1948, § 34; G.L. 1923, ch. 329, § 34; G.L. 1938, ch. 506, § 32; G.L., ch. 506, § 30; P.L. 1939, ch. 700, § 1; G.L. 1956; §

12-11-5

.